Washington statutes.
RCW 18.33.120

Consistent effect—Conflict with other state laws.

(1) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a participating state that is not inconsistent with the compact.

(2) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a participating state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(3) All permissible agreements between the commission and the participating states are binding in accordance with their terms.

[ 2023 c 297 s 13.]